Massachusetts, session 194th, H4112.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 148 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 61. There shall be a separate fund on the books of the commonwealth to be
known as the Fire Suppression Water Resource Fund. The fund shall consist of all monies
recovered as fees under section 4H of chapter 175 and any monies appropriated to the fund by
the general court. Such monies shall be deposited to the credit of the fund and shall, in addition
to any other monies made available for such purpose, be expended by the state fire marshal,
without further appropriation, for fire safety and prevention programs including for the purchase
and installation of firefighting water cisterns in the commonwealth’s rural and urban interface
regions with restricted access to water. All payments from such fund shall be made on the audit
and warrant of the state treasurer on vouchers certified and submitted by the secretary.
of 3

SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4G the following section:-
Section 4H. (a) There shall be a $2 fee on each homeowner’s insurance policy issued or
renewed by any insurer authorized to issue such policies within the commonwealth.
(b) The fee shall be collected annually by the insurer at the time of issuance or renewal
and shall be remitted quarterly to the commissioner, who shall deposit such funds into the Fire
Suppression Water Resource Safety Fund established in section 61 of chapter 148.
SECTION 3. (a) There shall be a special commission established to conduct a
comprehensive study on the most effective and efficient means of implementing a cistern
program across the commonwealth. The commission shall seek to investigate the costs and
feasibility of creating a statewide system of water storage cisterns for the storage of water at the
interface of rural and urban communities for use by the fire service in combating fire where
water resources are limited.
(b) The commission shall consist of 6 members that shall include: (i) the state fire
marshal or their designee, who shall serve as chair; (ii) the director of the Massachusetts
emergency management agency or their designee; (iii) the commissioner of the department of
environmental protection or their designee; (iv) the commissioner of the division of occupational
licensure or their designee; (v) the chief fire warden of the department of conservation and
recreation; and (vi) a representative from the Fire Chiefs’ Association of Massachusetts.
(c) The study shall include, but not be limited to: (i) input and recommendations from the
appropriate municipal representatives from communities with documented water access
challenges; (ii) evaluating the optimal placement of cisterns based on fire risk and water access;
of 3

(iii) ensuring that any cistern deployment strategy is based on data-driven decision-making and
informed by industry best practices; and (iv) the cost to construct 10 cisterns per year and the
costs for the construction, installation and maintenance of water storage cisterns at the interface
of rural and urban communities throughout the commonwealth.
(d) The commission shall prepare a report on its activities and on any findings and
recommendations for a statewide firefighting cistern strategy including, but not limited to: (i)
identifying priority areas for installation; (ii) potential funding sources; and (iii) regulatory or
legislative changes needed to facilitate implementation. The report shall be submitted to the: (i)
secretary of the executive office of public safety and security; (ii) joint committee on public
safety and homeland security; and (iii) offices of the house and senate clerk not later than
January 1, 2027.
of 3